Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.041

Violations—Civil penalty.

Every person who fails to comply with this chapter or the rules adopted under it may be subjected to a civil penalty, as determined by the director, in an amount of not more than two thousand dollars for every such violation. Each and every such violation shall be a separate and distinct offense.

[ 1989 c 354 s 74.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 354 ss 70-81 and 84-86: See note following RCW 15.49.005.

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.